Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 2. Alaska Temporary Assistance Program.

Sec. 47.27.010.
Eligible families.

The following families may apply under the Alaska temporary assistance program:

a single parent who has the physical custody of one or more related dependent children;

a caretaker of one or more dependent children who is a relative to at least the fifth degree;

a woman in the last trimester of pregnancy;

a two-parent family with physical custody of one or more related dependent children.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 16 ch 69 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska temporary assistance program, see 7 AAC 45.

Sec. 47.27.015.
Disqualifying conditions.

A family is not eligible for cash assistance under the Alaska temporary assistance program if the family includes an adult who

has received cash assistance under the Alaska temporary assistance program, or a program of another state operated under a federal assistance grant program for needy families, for a total of 60 months as the caretaker or spouse of a caretaker of a dependent child or as a pregnant woman, unless the caretaker or pregnant woman is

a person who the department has reasonable cause to believe is or recently has been the victim of domestic violence, as defined in AS

18.66.990

, and the physical, mental, or emotional well-being of the victim would be endangered by a strict application of the time limit otherwise applicable under this subsection;

determined, under regulations of the department to be physically or mentally unable to perform gainful activity;

a parent who is providing care for a child who is experiencing a disability; or

a family determined by the department to be exempt from this paragraph by reason of hardship; or

is determined to be fleeing to avoid prosecution, custody, or confinement after conviction, in this or another jurisdiction, for a crime that is classified as a felony or a class A misdemeanor under AS 11 or the criminal laws of the jurisdiction where the criminal activity was committed.

A family is not eligible for cash assistance or self-sufficiency services under this chapter for a period of 120 months beginning on the date the adult applicant for the family is convicted of having fraudulently misrepresented the applicant’s residence in order to receive cash assistance or self-sufficiency services in more than one state under a program financed with federal money under any successor federal program that replaces the aid to families with dependent children program.

A family is not eligible for cash assistance for the following time periods if the family’s demonstrated need for cash assistance is due to a refusal of or voluntary separation from suitable employment by the adult applicant, or a custodial parent or caretaker, without good cause:

one month for the first refusal or separation without good cause;

six months for the second refusal or separation without good cause; and

12 months for the third and subsequent refusal or separation without good cause.

A family is not eligible for cash assistance or self-sufficiency services for up to 12 months if the family’s demonstrated need is due to an intentional transfer of an asset or assets at less than fair market value for the purpose of establishing eligibility for cash assistance or self-sufficiency services. A period of ineligibility shall begin on the first day of the month following the transfer of the asset or assets and shall remain in effect for a number of months equal to the fair market value of the transferred asset or assets divided by the maximum payment amount for the family as established under AS

47.27.025

, or for 12 months, whichever is less.

An Alaska temporary assistance program applicant or participant who is administratively disqualified for making a false statement or misrepresentation knowing it was false, or for knowingly failing to disclose a material fact, in order to obtain or increase cash assistance or self-sufficiency services under this chapter is not eligible to receive cash assistance or self-sufficiency services under this chapter for a period of

six months following the first disqualification;

12 months following the second disqualification; and

permanently following the third disqualification.

The number of families for which an exemption is in effect under (a)(1) of this section may not exceed 25 percent of the number of families receiving cash assistance under this chapter.

A person who is an alien is not eligible for cash assistance under this chapter unless the person is a qualified alien under 8 U.S.C. 1641 or an alien excepted under 8 U.S.C. 1612(b). However, a qualified alien may only be eligible for cash assistance under this chapter if the person is not precluded by the limited eligibility provision of 8 U.S.C. 1613.

When determining under (a)(1) of this section whether an adult has received cash assistance for a total of 60 months, the department shall disregard the months that are required to be disregarded under 42 U.S.C. 608(a)(7)(D).

A person convicted after August 22, 1996, of an offense that is classified as a felony under AS

11.71.010

-

11.71.040

or by the law of another jurisdiction that has as an element the possession, use, or distribution of a controlled substance, as defined in AS

11.71.900

, is disqualified from receiving temporary assistance under this chapter or food stamps under AS 47.25 unless the person demonstrates, to the satisfaction of the department, that the person

is satisfactorily serving, or has successfully completed, a period of probation or parole;

is in the process of serving, or has successfully completed, mandatory participation in a drug or alcohol treatment program;

has taken action toward rehabilitation, including participation in a drug or alcohol treatment program; or

is successfully complying with the requirements of the person’s reentry plan.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996; am §§ 39, 40 ch 32 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 82 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 2001; am § 17 ch 69 SLA 2002; am § 169 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (g) was enacted as (f). Relettered in 1997. In 1997, in subparagraph (a)(1)(A), “AS

18.66.990

” was substituted for “AS

18.66.900

” to reconcile chs. 64 and 107, SLA 1996.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska temporary assistance program, see 7 AAC 45.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, added (i).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 56(a), ch. 107, SLA 1996 provides that subsection (e) applies “to disqualifications imposed on or after the effective” date of this section. Section 56(b), ch. 107, SLA 1996 provides that subsection (c) applies “to refusals to accept, and separations from, suitable employment without good cause that occur on or after the effective” date of this section.

Legislative history reports. —

For purposes of amendments to this section made by §§ 39 and 40,
ch. 32, SLA 1997, see 1997 House Journal Supp. No. 9.

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the addition of subsection (g) by § 3,
ch. 82, SLA 1997 (CSHB 153(FIN)), see 1997 House Journal 442.

Collateral references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state statutes limiting or barring public health care to indigent aliens. 113 ALR5th 95.

Sec. 47.27.020.
Application requirements.

An applicant under the Alaska temporary assistance program shall complete an application in writing, or by electronic means, and in a form specified by the department. The applicant must be a pregnant woman or an individual who has physical custody of the dependent child or children. The application must be complete and must provide all of the information about the family and the child or children that is requested by the department. The applicant shall provide all supporting documentation for verification that the department determines to be necessary to establish eligibility.

On the application, each applicant shall attest to whether the family, at any time, has received cash assistance or self-sufficiency services from another state program that was established with federal money under the federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program and whether the family has ever been disqualified from receiving cash assistance or self-sufficiency services under the federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program for the period for which the application has been submitted.

An applicant shall agree to cooperate with the department to establish a family self-sufficiency plan and to participate in work activities when assigned by the department.

An applicant shall acknowledge the assignment of support rights as required by AS

47.27.040(a)

and shall agree to cooperate with the child support services agency of the Department of Revenue to the extent required under AS

47.27.040(b)

. The applicant shall agree to report all child support payments received directly by the family, during or for a period for which the family is receiving cash assistance under this chapter, to the department within 15 days after receipt of those payments.

An applicant shall update the information requested in the application at regular intervals as established by the department in regulation. The department may conduct reviews of an application and audit the information provided as necessary to determine eligibility.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996; am §§ 18 — 20 ch 69 SLA 2002; am § 73 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in (d) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska temporary assistance program, see 7 AAC 45.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective June 3, 2003, rewrote subsection (b).

Sec. 47.27.025.
Cash assistance.

The department shall provide cash assistance to families that establish eligibility based on a determination of need that considers the family’s available income, assets, and other resources, as established by the department in regulation. Each dependent child in the family is eligible for cash assistance except as otherwise provided in AS

47.27.015

or

47.27.027(b)

, and cash assistance received as a dependent child does not count against eligibility for cash assistance under this chapter as a caretaker or spouse of a caretaker of a dependent child or as a pregnant woman.

The amounts of cash assistance may not exceed the following:

for a dependent child living with a nonneedy relative caretaker, $452 per month, plus $102 for each additional child;

for a dependent child living with at least one needy parent or relative caretaker, $821 per month, plus $102 for each additional child and $102 for a second needy parent if the second parent is physically or mentally unable to perform gainful activity as defined by department regulation; or

for a family consisting solely of an eligible pregnant woman, $514 per month.

The department shall, for the months of July, August, and September, reduce by 50 percent the maximum cash assistance for which the family is otherwise eligible if the family’s eligibility for cash assistance is based on AS

47.27.010

(4), unless the second needy parent is determined, under regulations of the department, to be physically or mentally unable to perform gainful activity or to be providing care for a child who is experiencing a disability that requires 24-hour care, as certified by a physician or other licensed medical professional. However, if the commissioner determines that temporary economic conditions have resulted in decreased employment opportunities during those months and a reduction in cash assistance would impose an undue hardship on a family, the department may waive application of this subsection with respect to that family.

The department shall reduce cash assistance under this section to the extent that the family’s shelter costs are lower than the standard shelter allowance used by the department for similar families. The shelter allowance for a family whose costs are below the standard allowance shall be an amount equal to the family’s actual verified shelter costs. In this subsection,

“shelter allowance” means the portion of the cash assistance provided under this section that is allocated by the department for shelter costs;

“shelter costs” means

rental payments or mortgage payments for the family’s housing, including payments made for property or mortgage insurance and property taxes; and

the cost of utilities, including heat, electricity, basic telephone service, water, sewer, and garbage services incurred for the family’s housing; the department may establish different utility cost standards for different areas of the state and may use an average utility cost per month based on estimated level payments over a 12-month period.

The department may, instead of paying all of the cash assistance to a family under this section, use all or part of the cash assistance as a wage subsidy paid to an employer who employs a person in the family at a wage that is higher than the wage subsidy. If authorized under AS

47.25.975

(b), the department may, instead of paying all of a family’s food stamp allotment under AS

47.25.975

—

47.25.990

in a form restricted to buying food, use all or part of the value of the family’s food stamp allotment as a wage subsidy paid to an employer who employs a person in the family at a wage that is higher than the total of the wage subsidies paid under this subsection for employment of the person. A subsidy under this subsection may not exceed one year in duration.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 75 SLA 2001; am §§ 21 — 25 ch 69 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska temporary assistance program, see 7 AAC 45.

Sec. 47.27.026.
Diversion payments.

The department may offer a lump-sum diversion payment in place of ongoing cash assistance to an adult applicant who applies under AS

47.27.020

if the adult applicant is job ready and is determined to need only short-term financial assistance and self-sufficiency services to meet critical needs in order to secure employment and support for the adult applicant’s family. The department shall set standards and conditions for diversion payments and self-sufficiency services by regulation.

The department may pay a diversion payment to an applicant’s family only if that family appears to be eligible for cash assistance under AS

47.27.020

and to include a job-ready individual based on the information provided to the department in the application completed under AS

47.27.020

. The department may offer to an applicant with the potential to participate in the diversion project a choice between

having the Alaska temporary assistance program application processed under AS 47.27.020 and the regulations adopted by the department; or

having the application referred to the diversion project of the Alaska temporary assistance program for a determination of eligibility for a diversion project payment and self-sufficiency services under this section.

The amount of a diversion payment with self-sufficiency services must be sufficient to meet the family’s immediate needs as determined by the department and the participant. A diversion payment may not exceed the amount the family would be eligible to receive as cash assistance in the first three months of eligibility under AS

47.27.025

if the family did not elect to receive a diversion payment.

As a condition of a family receiving a diversion payment under this section, the participant must sign an agreement that

specifies

the amount of the diversion payment and the needs it is intended to cover;

the self-sufficiency services required to meet the family’s immediate needs;

provides that, during the three-month period beginning with the month in which the diversion payment was received, child support collected on behalf of a child whose needs were considered in determining the diversion payment shall be paid to the family; and

provides that if the family reapplies under AS

47.27.020

during the three months beginning with the month in which the family received a diversion payment, the diversion payment shall be treated as unearned income, prorated over the three-month period, and deducted from any cash assistance that the family may be eligible for under the new application.

A family that receives a diversion payment may not receive another diversion payment before the 12th month following the month in which it last received a diversion payment. A family may not receive more than four diversion payments.

To the extent that (d)(2) of this section is inconsistent with AS

25.27.120

or

25.27.130

, or with another provision of this chapter, (d)(2) of this section governs.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996; am §§ 26 — 30 ch 69 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska temporary assistance program, see 7 AAC 45.

Sec. 47.27.027.
Assistance to minors.

If an applicant under AS

47.27.020

is not married, is under the age of 18, and has not been previously emancipated under AS

09.55.590

, the applicant must

live in a home maintained by the applicant’s parent, legal guardian, or other adult relative, unless the applicant establishes that there is good cause, as established by the department in regulation, to waive this requirement; if the department waives this requirement, the applicant must live in an approved, adult-supervised, supportive living environment;

agree that cash assistance on behalf of the applicant’s family may be paid to the applicant’s parent, legal guardian, or other adult relative, or, if applicable, to the adult head of the adult-supervised, supportive living environment in which the applicant resides; and

maintain attendance in a secondary school or other appropriate training program unless the applicant has a high school diploma or general equivalent diploma.

The department shall reduce the cash assistance for which an assistance unit is otherwise eligible under this chapter if a minor parent in the assistance unit fails, without good cause, to meet standards of adequate levels of school attendance, as defined in regulations of the department. The reduction under this subsection shall be achieved by disregarding the needs of the person who failed to meet the school attendance standards. The person’s needs shall be disregarded until the minor parent complies.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 31 ch 69 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska temporary assistance program, see 7 AAC 45.

Sec. 47.27.030.
Family self-sufficiency services.

A participant in the Alaska temporary assistance program shall cooperate with the department, or its designee, to develop and sign a family self-sufficiency plan that includes

the steps the family will take towards the self-sufficiency of the family;

the self-sufficiency services the department will provide to assist the family to attain self-sufficiency;

specific benchmarks to indicate the steps toward successful completion of the family plan;

a statement that the family may be subject to reductions in cash assistance or self-sufficiency services or other sanctions if the family fails to comply with the family plan; and

a statement that describes the necessary conditions and the steps that must be taken to renegotiate the terms of the family plan.

The family self-sufficiency plan must set a time period for the achievement of self-sufficiency from cash assistance under the Alaska temporary assistance program. Initially, that time period may not provide for any more than a total of 60 months of cash assistance under the Alaska temporary assistance program even though the family may eventually be eligible for an exemption under AS

47.27.015(a)(1)

. Unless the members of the family who are not dependent children are all exempt under AS

47.27.035(b)

— (d), the time period for receiving cash assistance may not exceed a cumulative total of 24 months unless each nonexempt person is in compliance with the work activity assignment made under AS

47.27.035

.

A family is exempt from the requirement that the family have a self-sufficiency plan under this section if the family

does not include a needy adult; or

[Repealed, § 3 ch 75 SLA 2001.]

is receiving a diversion payment under AS

47.27.026

.

The department may provide only self-sufficiency services to a family that no longer qualifies for cash assistance due to employment, a family that is disqualified from receiving cash assistance under AS

47.27.015(a)(1)

, (c), or (g), or a family that qualifies for cash assistance but requests only self-sufficiency services. Self-sufficiency services that are made available to a family under this subsection shall be based on a determination of need established by the department in regulation. If a family receives only self-sufficiency services, the department may waive the self-sufficiency plan requirements specified in (a) and (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 75 SLA 2001; am §§ 32 — 34 ch 69 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska temporary assistance program, see 7 AAC 45.

Sec. 47.27.035.
Participation in work activities.

An Alaska temporary assistance program participant shall, after the participant’s family has received a cumulative total of 24 months of cash assistance or sooner if assigned to do so by the department, participate in work activities as assigned by the department or its designee in order for the family to continue to receive cash assistance or self-sufficiency services from the department under the Alaska temporary assistance program, unless the participant is exempt from the work participation requirements under one or more of the exemptions set out in (b) — (d) of this section.

A parent or caretaker with a dependent child of up to 12 months of age may be exempt from work participation requirements for up to 12 months, as established in the family self-sufficiency plan.

A parent or caretaker may be exempt from work participation requirements in the family self-sufficiency plan if

the parent or caretaker is providing home care for a child who is experiencing a disability or a related, disabled person who requires 24-hour care;

the parent or caretaker establishes an inability to participate for medical reasons supported by documentation from a physician or other licensed medical professional;

the participation would impose an unreasonable hardship on the family; or

there is a dependent child in the home that has not yet attained six years of age and the parent or caretaker demonstrates an inability to obtain needed child care because appropriate child care is not available.

The department may not require a person to participate in work activities under (a) of this section

if the person is the sole custodial parent for a child under six years of age unless the department agrees to pay for the costs of child care determined by the department to be necessary for the person’s participation; and

unless the department agrees to pay for transportation expenses determined by the department to be necessary for the person’s participation in the activity.

A participant in work activities under this section is not a state employee for purposes of AS 39.25 (State Personnel Act).

A participant in work activities under this section is not considered an employee of the state or other public employer for purposes of AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

(Public Employment Relations Act) nor shall any provision of a collective bargaining agreement entered into under AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

be construed to interfere with the department’s authority to assign participants to work activities as authorized under this section.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 35 ch 69 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska temporary assistance program, see 7 AAC 45.

Sec. 47.27.040.
Assignment of support rights; cooperation with child support services agency.

An Alaska temporary assistance program applicant is considered to have assigned to the state, through the child support services agency of the Department of Revenue, all rights to accrued and continuing child support, from all sources, that is due for the support of any individuals in the family for whom support is sought. The assignment takes effect upon a determination that the applicant’s family is eligible for cash assistance under this chapter. Except with respect to the amount of any unpaid support obligation accrued under the assignment, the assignment terminates when the family ceases to receive cash assistance under the Alaska temporary assistance program.

An Alaska temporary assistance program participant shall cooperate with the child support services agency of the Department of Revenue in establishing paternity or establishing, modifying, or enforcing a child support order requiring the payment of support by the noncustodial parent for a dependent child for whom Alaska temporary assistance program cash assistance is received. The child support enforcement agency shall determine whether the participant is in good faith compliance with the requirements of this subsection and shall inform the Department of Health and Social Services of its determination. The Department of Health and Social Services shall establish whether the participant has good cause for refusing to cooperate.

The department may distribute to an Alaska temporary assistance program participant $50 per month from a monthly child support payment, or the amount of the child support payment if it is less than $50, received by the child support services agency for the support of a child for whom Alaska temporary assistance program cash assistance is paid.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 147 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 36 ch 69 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska temporary assistance program, see 7 AAC 45.

Editor’s notes. —

The delayed amendments to (b) of this section by § 148(c), ch. 87, SLA 1997, as amended by § 53, ch. 132, SLA 1998, which were to take effect July 1, 2001, were repealed by § 15, ch. 54, SLA 2001.

Sec. 47.27.045.
Alienation and attachment.

Cash assistance granted under this chapter is inalienable by assignment or transfer and is exempt from garnishment, levy, or execution as is provided in AS 09.38.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 37 ch 69 SLA 2002)

Sec. 47.27.050.
Grants and contracts for services.

The department may contract with or award grants to qualified entities in the state to administer an Alaska temporary assistance program or a distinct part of the Alaska temporary assistance program. The department may establish standards for the administration of services under the grant or contract, including fees to be charged to applicants for or recipients of those services.

Contracts authorized under this section are to be administered in accordance with AS

47.05.015

. Grants authorized under this section are to be awarded using requirements, established in regulation, that are substantially similar to those set out in AS

47.05.015

for contracts.

This section may not be construed to expand the powers of a municipality.

In this section, “qualified entities” include municipalities, other political subdivisions of the state, nonprofit corporations formed under AS 10.20, churches and religious organizations, and incorporated and unincorporated businesses operating within the state that meet the requirements established by the department in regulation.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska temporary assistance program, see 7 AAC 45.

For grant programs, see 7 AAC 78.

For grant services for individuals, see 7 AAC 81.

Sec. 47.27.055.
Agency collaboration.

The department shall coordinate with other state agencies that provide assistance, benefits, or services to applicants that are eligible for and to participants in the Alaska temporary assistance program in order to facilitate the application for and delivery of assistance, benefits, or services to promote family self-sufficiency. Subject to appropriations, state agencies may locate their facilities and operations near each other in order to improve service delivery.

The department may provide information received under this chapter to other state agencies in order to facilitate the delivery of services. Information received from an applicant for or participant in the Alaska temporary assistance program shall be treated as confidential by all state agencies that share the information under this section and is not open to public inspection or copying under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.125

. Misuse of public assistance lists or information is punishable as a violation of AS

47.05.030

.

Departments in the executive branch shall cooperate in fulfilling the purposes of this chapter, including, subject to appropriations, the establishment of temporary positions that will provide job opportunities for families participating in the Alaska temporary assistance program. Temporary positions established for this purpose are in the exempt service under AS

39.25.110

but are not subject to AS

39.25.195

. An individual participating in the Alaska temporary assistance program who holds a temporary position established for purposes of this subsection is not a public employee for purposes of AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.125

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.125” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.125.

Sec. 47.27.060.
Job development.

The department may establish cooperative agreements with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, Department of Education and Early Development, and Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, and with other public or private sector organizations for the purpose of developing job, training, and educational opportunities for families eligible for cash assistance or self-sufficiency services under this chapter.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 75 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 38 ch 69 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 47.27.065.
Federal-state cooperation.

In the administration of this chapter, the department shall cooperate with the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services and shall take actions necessary to comply with the requirements of federal law to obtain public assistance block grants or other federal assistance available for the purposes of this chapter. The department shall make reports in the form and containing the information required to the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services. The department may cooperate with federal agencies charged with the administration of the federal public assistance block grants and other financial assistance.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For public assistance, see 7 AAC 37.

For Alaska temporary assistance program, see 7 AAC 45.

Sec. 47.27.070.
Alaska native organizations’ family assistance programs.

The department may coordinate only with the following Alaska Native organizations, as designated under federal law, in the development of family assistance programs:

Arctic Slope Native Association;

Kawerak, Inc.;

Maniilaq Association;

Association of Village Council Presidents;

Tanana Chiefs Conference;

Cook Inlet Tribal Council;

Bristol Bay Native Association;

Aleutian and Pribilof Island Association;

Chugachmiut;

Tlingit Haida Central Council;

Kodiak Area Native Association;

Copper River Native Association; and

Metlakatla Indian Community of the Annette Islands Reserve; however, the department may cooperate with the Metlakatla Indian Community under this chapter only if the community waives any claim to sovereign immunity with respect to matters involved with the family assistance program.

The department may cooperate with the Alaska Native organizations named in (a) of this section to propose program criteria to the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services in order to promote programs comparable to the state program in the same area.

[Repealed, § 1 ch 13 31 SLA 2020.]

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 2020)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (c) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (c) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska temporary assistance program, see 7 AAC 45.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective July 19, 2020, repealed (c).

Sec. 47.27.075.
Emergency account established.

There is established within the general fund the Alaska temporary assistance program emergency account. The account consists of appropriations that were made by the legislature from federal money available for cash assistance, diversion payments, and self-sufficiency services under this chapter, including lapsing money that was previously appropriated from federal money for the Alaska temporary assistance program, but that were not expended or obligated in the fiscal year for which they were appropriated.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 39 ch 69 SLA 2002)

Sec. 47.27.080.
Appeals; dispute resolution.

An applicant or participant who receives a determination from the department that denies, limits, or modifies the cash assistance, diversion payment, or self-sufficiency services provided under this chapter may request a hearing before the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

). The office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) shall conduct the hearing under the regulations adopted by the department. The appeal is not subject to AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

.

The department may require an applicant or participant to participate in an informal dispute resolution process before a formal hearing. The department may adopt regulations establishing the informal dispute resolution process.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 40 ch 69 SLA 2002; am E.O. No. 116, § 11 (2012))

Cross references. —

For transition provisions for pending proceedings, rights, liabilities, or obligations under this section in effect on July 1, 2012, and regulations implementing this section in effect on July 1, 2012, see § 16, E.O. No. 116, in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska temporary assistance program, see 7 AAC 45.

For hearings, see 7 AAC 49.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

)” for “department or a representative of the department appointed for that purpose”; in the second sentence, substituted “The office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

)” for “If a representative is appointed, the representative”.